Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2648.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 31HEALTH INSURANCE ALTERATION PROHIBITIONSSec.3101. Definitions.3102. Prohibited acts.§ 3101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617 "Biological product." As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 262 (relating to regulation of biological products)."Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Health care provider." An individual who is authorized to practice some component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate or registration issued by a Commonwealth licensing agency or board."Health care service." A covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supplies and equipment or other service, including behavioral health, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered person for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease under the terms of a health insurance policy."Health insurance policy." An individual or group insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services. The term does not include:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(7) A fixed indemnity policy.20260HB2648PN3671 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) A hospital indemnity policy.(9) A dental only policy.(10) A vision only policy.(11) A workers' compensation policy.(12) An automobile medical payment policy.(13) A homeowners' insurance policy.(14) A short-term limited duration policy.(15) Any other policy providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921 . (3) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act."Prescription drug." A controlled substance, drug, including a biological product, or device for medication prescribed or dispensed by order of a health care provider.§ 3102. Prohibited acts.(a) Alteration of coverage.--A health insurer may not alter the coverage provided by a health insurance policy during the term of a health insurance policy for a health care service that was included in the covered person's health insurance policy, including the period when the covered person has received the health care service. The alterations under this section include increasing:(1) A premium.20260HB2648PN3671 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A copayment.(3) Coinsurance.(4) A deductible.(b) Exceptions.--This section shall not apply to a health care service:(1) Obtained by a covered person through fraudulent or criminal activity.(2) Subject to:(i) a statement issued by the United States Food and Drug Administration calling into question the clinical safety of the benefit; or(ii) a notice provided by the manufacturer of a prescription drug to the United States Food and Drug Administration related to a manufacturing discontinuance or potential discontinuance of the drug.(c) Penalties.--A violation of this chapter shall be deemed a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a covered person from exercising any right provided under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. A civil penalty of up to $1,000 shall be imposed on a health insurer who violates this section.(d) Scope.--This section shall apply only to a health insurance policy issued by a health insurer licensed by the department.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Affect or inhibit the applicability of any provision 20260HB2648PN3671 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the act of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1163, No.259), known as the Generic Equivalent Drug Law.(2) Prohibit a health insurer from adding coverage for a health care service during the term of a health insurance policy.(3) Apply to any of the following:(i) A self-funded employer-sponsored health benefit plan governed by 29 U.S.C. Ch. 18 (relating to employee retirement income security program).(ii) An employer acting in its capacity as a plan sponsor.(iii) A health benefit arrangement not subject to regulation by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2648PN3671 - 5 - 1234567891011121314